District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1851.06

Use of funds.

Repealed.

History

Jan. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 129, Pub. L. 108-199, § 307
Dec. 20, 2006, 120 Stat. 3053, Pub. L. 109-432, Div. C, Title III, § 404(a)
Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 209, Pub. L. 112-10, § 3012(a)